Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 14.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5729
Smoking in place of employment or public place prohibited.

Except as otherwise provided in section 71-5730, it is unlawful for any person to smoke in a place of employment or a public place.

Laws 2008, LB395, § 14.